Utah statutes.
31A-30-206.   Minimum participation and contribution levels -- Premium payments.

An insurer who offers a health benefit plan for which an employer has established a defined contribution arrangement under the provisions of this part:

(1)  shall not:

(a)  establish an employer minimum contribution level for the health benefit plan premium under Section 31A-30-112, or any other law; or

(b)  discontinue or non-renew a policy under Subsection 31A-30-107(4) for failure to maintain a minimum employer contribution level;

(2)  shall accept premium payments for an enrollee from multiple sources through the Internet portal, including:

(a)  government assistance programs;

(b)  contributions from a Section 125 Cafeteria plan, a health reimbursement arrangement, or other qualified mechanism for pre-tax payments established by any employer of the enrollee;

(c)  contributions from a Section 125 Cafeteria plan, a health reimbursement arrangement, or other qualified mechanism for pre-tax payments established by an employer of a spouse or dependent of the enrollee; and

(d)  contributions from private sources of premium assistance; and

(3)  may require, as a condition of coverage, a minimum participation level for eligible employees of an employer, which for purposes of the defined contribution arrangement market may not exceed 75% participation.

